Idaho, session 2025, H0472.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That the Heading for Chapter 5, Title 73, Idaho Code, be, and
the same is hereby amended to read as follows:
CHAPTER 5
CORONAVIRUS STOP IDAHO MEDICAL FREEDOM ACT
SECTION 2. That Section 73-501, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
73-501. SHORT TITLE. This chapter shall be known and may be cited as
the "Coronavirus Stop Idaho Medical Freedom Act."
SECTION 3. That Section 73-502, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
73-502. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Business entity" means any person or group of persons performing
or engaging in any activity, enterprise, profession, or occupation for gain,
benefit, advantage, or livelihood, whether for profit or not-for-profit.
"Business entity" shall include but not be limited to:
(a) Self-employed individuals, business entities filing articles of
incorporation, partnerships, limited partnerships, limited liability
companies, foreign corporations, foreign limited partnerships, for-
eign limited liability companies authorized to transact business in
Idaho, business trusts, and any business entity that registers with the
secretary of state; and
(b) Any business entity that possesses a business license, permit, cer-
tificate, approval, registration, charter, or similar form of autho-
rization issued by the state; any business entity exempt by law from ob-
taining such a business license; and any business entity operating un-
lawfully without such a business license.
(2) "Coronavirus" means:
(a) Severe acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus 2;
(b) The disease caused by severe acute respiratory syndrome coron-
avirus 2; or


(c) Any subsequently identified mutation, modification, or strain of
severe acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus 2 if the transmission of
said virus among humans rises to the level of an epidemic or pandemic and
qualifies for an emergency declaration under applicable Idaho law.
(3) "Coronavirus vaccination" means the introduction of a coronavirus
vaccine into the human body.
(4) (2) "Foreign jurisdiction" means any state, commonwealth, country,
or nation outside the state of Idaho.
(3) "Medical intervention" means a procedure, treatment, device, drug,
injection, medication, or action taken to diagnose, prevent, or cure a dis-
ease or alter the health or biological function of a person.
(4) "School" means any public, private, or parochial preschool; any
kindergarten, elementary, or secondary school; any postsecondary institute
of education, including trade schools, colleges, and universities; or any
other institute of primary, secondary, or higher learning operating in this
state.
(5) "Ticket issuer" means an individual or entity providing tickets to
an entertainment event, including any of the following:
(a) The operator of the venue where an entertainment event occurs;
(b) The sponsor or promoter of an entertainment event;
(c) A sports team participating in an entertainment event or a league
whose teams are participating in an entertainment event;
(d) A theater company, musical group, or similar participant in an en-
tertainment event; or
(e) An agent of any individual or entity described in this subsection.
SECTION 4. That Section 73-503, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
73-503. CORONAVIRUS VACCINATION REQUIREMENTS MEDICAL MANDATES PRO-
HIBITED. (1) A business entity doing business in the state of Idaho shall not
refuse to provide any service, product, admission to a venue, or transporta-
tion to a person because that person has or has not received a coronavirus
vaccination or used a medical intervention.
(2) A business entity doing business in the state of Idaho shall not
require a coronavirus vaccination medical intervention as a term of em-
ployment unless required by federal law or in such cases where the terms of
employment include travel to foreign jurisdictions requiring coronavirus
vaccinations a medical intervention as the only coronavirus-related means
of entry or where the terms of employment require entry into a place of
business or facility in a foreign jurisdiction and such place of business
or facility requires a coronavirus vaccination medical intervention as the
only coronavirus-related means of entry. In any such instance where an
employee is required to obtain or use a coronavirus vaccination medical in-
tervention due to travel to a foreign jurisdiction or entry into a place of
business or facility in a foreign jurisdiction, said requirement shall ei-
ther be included in a valid written employment contract between the employer
and the employee or, when a written employment contract does not exist, ad-
vance written notice shall be provided to an impacted employee no less than
fourteen (14) days prior to such employee being required to receive or use a
coronavirus vaccination medical intervention. Business entities that re-


ceive medicare or medicaid funding shall be exempt from the requirements of
this subsection.
(3) A ticket issuer shall not penalize, discriminate against, or deny
access to an entertainment event to a ticket holder because the ticket holder
has or has not received or used a coronavirus vaccination medical interven-
tion.
(4) A school operating in the state shall not mandate a medical inter-
vention for any person to attend school, enter campus or school buildings, or
be employed by the school; provided, however, that nothing in this section
shall supersede the authority of a school district, or the board of trustees
of a school district, as provided for in chapter 5, title 33, Idaho Code.
(4) (5) Unless required by federal law, no state, county, or local gov-
ernment entity or official in Idaho shall require any person to receive or
use a coronavirus vaccination medical intervention.
(5) (6) Unless required by federal law, no state, county, or local gov-
ernment entity or official in Idaho shall require any person to receive or
use a coronavirus vaccination medical intervention as a condition for:
(a) Receipt of any government benefit;
(b) Receipt of any government services;
(c) Receipt of any government-issued license or permit;
(d) Entrance into any public building;
(e) Use of public transportation; or
(f) A term of employment, provided that such entities that receive
medicare or medicaid funding shall be exempt from the requirements of
this paragraph.
(6) (7) No state, county, or local government, or business entity in
Idaho shall provide or offer any different salary, hourly wage, or other on-
going compensation or benefits to an employee based on whether the employee
has or has not received or used a coronavirus vaccination medical interven-
tion. However, it shall not be unlawful for such entities to offer onetime
incentives related to coronavirus vaccinations that do not result in any
different salary, hourly wage, or ongoing compensation or benefits being
provided to an employee based on whether they have or have not received a
coronavirus vaccination. A business entity may permit its employees to be
released from work for the purpose of receiving a coronavirus vaccination.
(7) (8) The ability to require a coronavirus vaccination medical inter-
vention under this chapter is subject to other statutory or constitutional
provisions regarding requests for coronavirus vaccination exemptions
medical interventions and requirements to provide reasonable accommoda-
tion.
(9) The prohibition on medical interventions shall not apply to any
situation where personal protective equipment, items, or clothing are
required by employers in the public or private sectors based on existing tra-
ditional and accepted industry standards or federal law. These exemptions
to the prohibition on medical interventions shall not apply to or include
any vaccines, mask requirements, or other medical interventions introduced
during the COVID-19 pandemic.
(8) (10) The provisions of this chapter may be enforced and injunctive
relief may be pursued by either the attorney general or the prosecuting at-
torney for the county where a violation occurs. If a business entity, or


state, county, city, or local government entity in Idaho is found to have vi-
olated the provisions of this chapter, the attorney general or prosecuting
attorney, as applicable, shall be awarded attorney's fees and costs incurred
in pursuing the enforcement action.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.